Maryland, session 2025, SB0296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–1B–01.
In this subtitle, “Ombudsman” means the Public Access Ombudsman.
4–1B–02.
(a) There is an Office of the Public Access Ombudsman.
(b) Subject to § 4–1A–03(d)(2) of this title, the Office of the Attorney General shall
provide office space and staff for the Ombudsman, with appropriate steps taken to protect
the autonomy and independence of the Ombudsman.
4–1B–03.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the Attorney General shall
appoint the Ombudsman.
(b) The Ombudsman shall have been admitted to practice law in the State.
– 1 –

Ch. 665 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) The Office of the Attorney General shall publish, on its website, notice
of the Attorney General’s intent to consider applicants for the Ombudsman position.
(2) The notice shall include:
(i) application procedures;
(ii) criteria for evaluating an applicant’s qualifications; and
(iii) procedures for resolving any conflicts of interest.
(3) (i) An individual may submit to the Attorney General an application
for the Ombudsman position as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(ii) The Office of the Attorney General shall post on its website the
names and qualifications of applicants.
(d) (1) The term of the Ombudsman is 4 years.
(2) At the end of a term, the Ombudsman continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies.
(3) An Ombudsman who is appointed after a term begins serves for the
remainder of the term until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(e) The Ombudsman shall be a full–time State employee.
(f) The Ombudsman is entitled to an annual salary as provided for in the State
budget.
(G) THE OMBUDSMAN MAY DELEGATE TO A STAFF MEMBER OF THE OFFICE
OF THE PUBLIC ACCESS OMBUDSMAN ANY OF THE POWERS AND DUTIES GRANTED
TO THE OMBUDSMAN UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT ARE APPROPRIATE TO THE STAFF
MEMBER’S TRAINING AND EXPERTISE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –